Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1 UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO
23-20-142. Educator well-being and mental health program - reporting - repeal.

The university of Colorado health sciences center shall establish and operate an educator well-being and mental health program to provide support services for educators serving students in Colorado's public elementary and secondary schools.

The services provided through the educator well-being and mental health program must include, but are not limited to:

A hotline service for educators, providing daily telephone and text access;

Staffed support groups; and

Training and support programs for educators that focus on coping with stress and building resilience during the COVID-19 pandemic and recovery from the pandemic.

The department of higher education shall enter into a limited purpose fee-for-service contract with the university of Colorado health sciences center pursuant to section 23-18-308 to provide state funding for the educator well-being and mental health program to supplement other sources of funding.

On or before November 1, 2022, and on or before November 1 each year thereafter, the university of Colorado health sciences center shall submit a report to the department of higher education concerning the use of state funding for the educator well-being and mental health program, including information about the number of educators served, the services provided, funding received from other sources, and other relevant data and information about the implementation of the program and program outcomes.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-185), ch. 246, p. 1339, § 24, effective September 7.

23-20-143. High-potency THC marijuana and marijuana concentrate research.

The Colorado school of public health shall conduct a systematic review of all available scientific evidence-based research regarding the possible physical and mental health effects of high-potency THC marijuana and marijuana concentrates regardless of the location of the research.

The research must study the effect of high-potency THC marijuana on the developing brain and the effect of marijuana concentrates on physical and mental health. The research must systematically curate and synthesize existing research, identify evidence gaps, and identify new research that is needed to better understand the health implications of high-potency THC marijuana products and the specific THC potency levels and amounts at which various health concerns arise. The Colorado school of public health shall report by January 31, 2022, to the finance committee and public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives and the finance committee and health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees, whether they have identified any gaps in the research, and, if there are gaps, what those gaps are, what studies are needed to fill those gaps, the funding needed to complete those studies, and the timeline for completion of the necessary studies. Nothing in this section shall preclude the Colorado school of public health from making recommendations regarding appropriate regulatory measures to the scientific review council created in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

The research must be conducted independently without any predetermined outcomes or undue influence from any party.

The Colorado school of public health shall produce an initial report of its findings by July 1, 2022, and shall provide that report to the scientific review council created in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the finance committee and public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives and the finance committee and health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees. If at any point prior to the completion of the final report the Colorado school of public health believes there is sufficient scientific evidence to make a recommendation regarding appropriate regulatory measures, the Colorado school of public health shall provide those recommendations to the scientific review council created in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the finance committee and public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives and the finance committee and health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees. If after submitting the initial report the Colorado school of public health believes additional research and reporting is necessary, the Colorado school of public health may, subject to available appropriations, conduct additional research and issue additional reports and recommendations to the scientific review council created in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the finance committee and public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives and the finance committee and health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees. If after July 1, 2022, additional research is conducted and sufficient data from that research shows a prevalence of negative physical or mental health outcomes from the use of high-potency THC marijuana or marijuana products, the Colorado school of public health shall submit a report regarding the findings to the scientific review council created in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the finance committee and public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives and the finance committee and health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees. Any recommendations must not include additional criminal penalties related to marijuana concentrate use, possession, or possession of paraphernalia or new crimes related to marijuana concentrate use, possession, or possession of paraphernalia.

The Colorado school of public health shall establish a scientific review council to review the initial report and any subsequent reports produced pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section and make recommendations to the general assembly regarding appropriate evidence-based regulatory changes and the funding of additional necessary evidence-based research. The dean of the Colorado school of public health, in conjunction with the dean of the medical school at the university of Colorado and the dean of the school of pharmacy at the university of Colorado, shall appoint members, with a goal of at least twenty-five percent of the members representing communities of color, to the scientific review council who do not have a pecuniary interest or anyone in their immediate family who does not have a pecuniary interest, who represent an unbiased group of professionals, as follows:

An epidemiologist;

A physician familiar with the administration of medical marijuana pursuant to current state laws with experience recommending medical marijuana to those who are age zero to seventeen;

A medical toxicologist;

A neurologist;

A pediatrician;

A psychiatrist;

An internal medicine physician or other specialist in adult medicine;

A preventive medicine specialist or public health professional;

A licensed substance use disorder specialist;

A neuropsychopharmacologist; and

A medical or public health expert who specializes in racial and health disparities and systemic inequalities in health care and medicine.

The scientific review council shall post public notice of each committee meeting at least two weeks before the meeting, and the meetings must be broadcast to the public. Nothing precludes the public from submitting written comments to the committee.

Based on its research and findings, the Colorado school of public health shall produce a public education campaign for the general public regarding the effect of high-potency THC marijuana on the developing brain and on physical and mental health. The scientific review council created in subsection (2)(b) of this section shall approve the public education campaign.

The Colorado school of public health shall not seek, accept, or use gifts, grants, or donations to fund the provisions of this section. The provisions of this section shall be completed using only appropriations from the general assembly.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1317), ch. 313, p. 1908, § 1, effective June 24.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 23-20-142 in HB 21-1317 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

23-20-144. Colorado pediatric psychiatry consultation and access program (CoPPCAP) - created.

There is created in the university of Colorado the Colorado pediatric psychiatry consultation and access program, referred to in this section as "CoPPCAP". CoPPCAP shall:

Support primary care providers to identify and treat mild to moderate pediatric behavioral health conditions in primary care practices or school-based health centers;

Provide support and assistance to primary care providers with the integration of pediatric behavioral health screening and treatment into primary care practices;

Provide peer-to-peer consultations with primary care providers and integrated behavioral health clinicians;

Identify evidence-based resources and care coordination to support diagnosis, treatment, and referrals for children with behavioral health and substance use needs;

Support all patients seen in Colorado primary care practices regardless of payer or ability to pay;

Create ongoing educational opportunities focused on pediatric behavioral health conditions; and

Create digital resources focused on pediatric behavioral health conditions.

CoPPCAP may enter into agreements with the department of public health and environment regarding the provision of federal health resources and services administration programs.

CoPPCAP may collaborate with state agencies, school-based health centers, primary care providers, integrated behavioral health clinics, and community-based social service or behavioral health providers to provide behavioral health assessment and treatment to children and families.

CoPPCAP is authorized to seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations from private or public sources to implement CoPPCAP.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate four million six hundred thousand dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created pursuant to section 24-75-230 to the board of regents of the university of Colorado to fund CoPPCAP to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic and its negative public health impacts. CoPPCAP must spend or obligate this money in accordance with section 24-75-226 (4)(d).

The board of regents of the university of Colorado and CoPPCAP shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-147), ch. 175, p. 1164, § 2, effective May 17; (4) amended, (HB 22-1411), ch. 271, p. 1959, § 11, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Section 24(1)(c) of chapter 271 (HB 22-1411), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section takes effect only if SB 22-147 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1411 or SB 22-147, whichever is later. HB 22-1411 became law and took effect May 27, 2022, and SB 22-147 took effect May 17, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-147, see section 1 of chapter 175, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.